New Jersey, session 222, A4357.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1[1. Section 8 of P.L.2017, c.117 (C.26:2S-29) is amended to read as follows: 8.    a.  A carrier that offers a health benefits plan in this State shall provide coverage and payment for health care services delivered to a covered person through telemedicine or telehealth, on the same basis as[, and at a provider reimbursement rate that does not exceed the provider reimbursement rate that is applicable,] when the services are delivered through in-person contact and consultation in New Jersey, provided the services are otherwise covered under the plan when delivered through in-person contact and consultation in New Jersey. Reimbursement payments under this section may be provided either to the individual practitioner who delivered the reimbursable services, or to the agency, facility, or organization that employs the individual practitioner who delivered the reimbursable services, as appropriate. b.    A carrier may limit coverage to services that are delivered by health care providers in the health benefits plan's network, but may not charge any deductible, copayment, or coinsurance for a health care service, delivered through telemedicine or telehealth, in an amount that exceeds the deductible, copayment, or coinsurance amount that is applicable to an in-person consultation.  In no case shall a carrier: (1)   impose any restrictions on the location or setting of the distant site used by a health care provider to provide services using telemedicine and telehealth or on the location or setting of the originating site where the patient is located when receiving services using telemedicine and telehealth, except to ensure that the services provided using telemedicine and telehealth meet the same standard of care as would be provided if the services were provided in person; (2)   restrict the ability of a provider to use any electronic or technological platform to provide services using telemedicine or telehealth, including, but not limited to, interactive, real-time, two-way audio, which may be used in combination with asynchronous store-and-forward technology without video capabilities, including audio-only telephone conversations, to provide services using telemedicine or telehealth, provided that the platform used: (a) allows the provider to meet the same standard of care as would be provided if the services were provided in person; and (b)   is compliant with the requirements of the federal health privacy rule set forth at 45 CFR Parts 160 and 164; (3)   deny coverage for or refuse to provide reimbursement for routine patient monitoring performed using telemedicine and telehealth, including remote monitoring of a patient's vital signs and routine check-ins with the patient to monitor the patient's status and condition, if coverage and reimbursement would be provided if those services are provided in person, and the provider is able to meet the same standard of care as would be provided if the services were provided in person; or (4) limit coverage only to services delivered by select third-party telemedicine or telehealth organizations. c.     Nothing in this section shall be construed to: (1)   prohibit a carrier from providing coverage for only those services that are medically necessary, subject to the terms and conditions of the covered person's health benefits plan; or (2)   allow a carrier to require a covered person to use telemedicine or telehealth in lieu of receiving an in-person service from an in-network provider. d.    The Commissioner of Banking and Insurance shall adopt rules and regulations, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), to implement the provisions of this section. e.     As used in this section: "Asynchronous store-and-forward" means the same as that term is defined by section 1 of P.L.2017, c.117 (C.45:1-61). "Carrier" means the same as that term is defined by section 2 of P.L.1997, c.192 (C.26:2S-2). "Covered person" means the same as that term is defined by section 2 of P.L.1997, c.192 (C.26:2S-2). "Distant site" means the same as that term is defined by section 1 of P.L.2017, c.117 (C.45:1-61). "Health benefits plan" means the same as that term is defined by section 2 of P.L.1997, c.192 (C.26:2S-2). "Originating site" means the same as that term is defined by section 1 of P.L.2017, c.117 (C.45:1-61). "Telehealth" means the same as that term is defined by section 1 of P.L.2017, c.117 (C.45:1-61). "Telemedicine" means the same as that term is defined by section 1 of P.L.2017, c.117 (C.45:1-61). "Telemedicine or telehealth organization" means the same as that term is defined by section 1 of P.L.2017, c.117 (C.45:1-61). (cf: P.L.2021, c.310, s.1)]1 1[2. (New section) A carrier that offers a health benefits plan in this State shall provide coverage and payment for health care services delivered to a covered person through telemedicine or telehealth at a provider reimbursement rate that equals the provider reimbursement rate that is applicable, when the services are delivered through in-person contact and consultation in New Jersey, provided the services are otherwise covered by the health benefits plan when delivered through in-person contact and consultation in New Jersey.  The requirements of this subsection shall not apply to: (1)   a health care service provided by a telemedicine or telehealth organization that does not provide the health care service on an in-person basis in New Jersey; or (2) a physical health care service that was provided through real-time, two-way audio without a video component, whether or not utilized in combination with asynchronous store-and-forward technology, including through audio-only telephone conversation. The reimbursement rate for a physical health care service that is subject to this paragraph shall be determined under the contract with the provider; provided that the reimbursement rate for a physical health care service when provided through audio-only telephone conversation shall be at least 50 percent of the reimbursement rate for the service when provided in person. (3)   The provisions of paragraph (2) of this subsection shall not apply to a behavioral health service that was provided through real-time, two-way audio without a video component, whether or not utilized in combination with asynchronous store-and-forward technology, including audio-only telephone conversation.  A behavioral health care service described in this paragraph shall be reimbursed at a rate that equals the provider reimbursement rate for the service when provided in person. b.    For the purposes of this section: Carrier means an insurance company, health service corporation, hospital service corporation, medical service corporation, or health maintenance organization authorized to issue health benefits plans in this State. Covered person means the same as that term is defined in section 2 of P.L.1997, c.192 (C.26:2S-2); a benefits recipient as that term is defined under section 7 of P.L.2017, c.117 (C.30:4D-6k); and a person covered under a contract purchased by the State Health Benefits Commission or the School Employees Health Benefits Commission. Health benefits plan means a benefits plan which pays hospital or medical expense benefits for covered services, and is delivered or issued for delivery in this State by or through a carrier or a contract purchased by the State Health Benefits Commission or the School Employees Health Benefits Commission.  The term shall include the State Medicaid program established pursuant to P.L.1968, c.410 (C.30:4D-1 et seq.) and the NJ FamilyCare program established pursuant to P.L.2005, c.156 (C.30:4J-8 et al.).]1 11. Section 11 of P.L.2021, c.310 is amended to read as follows: 11. a.  For the period beginning on the effective date of P.L.2021, c.310 and ending on [July 1, 2026] December 31, 2027, a health benefits plan in this State shall provide coverage and payment for health care services delivered to a covered person through telemedicine or telehealth at a provider reimbursement rate that equals the provider reimbursement rate that is applicable, when the services are delivered through in-person contact and consultation in New Jersey, provided the services are otherwise covered by the health benefits plan when delivered through in-person contact and consultation in New Jersey.  The requirements of this subsection shall not apply to: (1)   a health care service provided by a telemedicine or telehealth organization that does not provide the health care service on an in-person basis in New Jersey; or (2) a physical health care service that was provided through real-time, two-way audio without a video component, whether or not utilized in combination with asynchronous store-and-forward technology, including through audio-only telephone conversation. The reimbursement rate for a physical health care service that is subject to this paragraph shall be determined under the contract with the provider; provided that the reimbursement rate for a physical health care service when provided through audio-only telephone conversation shall be at least 50 percent of the reimbursement rate for the service when provided in person. (3)   The provisions of paragraph (2) of this subsection shall not apply to a behavioral health service that was provided through real-time, two-way audio without a video component, whether or not utilized in combination with asynchronous store-and-forward technology, including audio-only telephone conversation.  A behavioral health care service described in this paragraph shall be reimbursed at a rate that equals the provider reimbursement rate for the service when provided in person. b.    For the purposes of this section: Carrier means an insurance company, health service corporation, hospital service corporation, medical service corporation, or health maintenance organization authorized to issue health benefits plans in this State. Covered person means the same as that term is defined in section 2 of P.L.1997, c.192 (C.26:2S-2); a benefits recipient as that term is defined under section 7 of P.L.2017, c.117 (C.30:4D-6k); and a person covered under a contract purchased by the State Health Benefits Commission or the School Employees Health Benefits Commission. Health benefits plan means a benefits plan which pays hospital or medical expense benefits for covered services, and is delivered or issued for delivery in this State by or through a carrier or a contract purchased by the State Health Benefits Commission or the School Employees Health Benefits Commission. The term shall include the State Medicaid program established pursuant to P.L.1968, c.410 (C.30:4D-1 et seq.) and the NJ FamilyCare program established pursuant to P.L.2005, c.156 (C.30:4J-8 et al.).1 (cf: P.L.2024, c.105, s.1) 1[3.] 2.1     This act shall take effect immediately.